District of Columbia statutes.
1-807.04

Treatment of Trust Fund under certain laws.

(a)

Internal Revenue Code. —

For purposes of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986:

(1)

The Trust Fund shall be treated as a trust described in § 401(a) of the Code which is exempt from taxation under § 501(a) of the Code;

(2)

Any transfer to or distribution from the Trust Fund shall be treated in the same manner as a transfer to or distribution from a trust described in § 401(a) of the Code; and

(3)

The benefits provided by the Trust Fund shall be treated as benefits provided under a governmental plan maintained by the District of Columbia.

(b)

ERISA. —

For purposes of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, the benefits provided by the Trust Fund shall be treated as benefits provided under a governmental plan maintained by the District of Columbia.

(c)

Application of certain future amendments to Internal Revenue Code. —

To the extent that any provision of subpart A of part I of subchapter D of chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.) is amended August 5, 1997, such provision as amended shall apply to the Trust Fund only to the extent the Secretary determines that application of the provision as amended is consistent with the administration of this chapter.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 724, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11034

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-817.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-764.4.

References in Text

Sections 401 and 501 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in (a), are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 401 and 501, respectively.

The “Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,” referred to in (b), is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.